Hawaii statutes.
[§159-12] License required. It shall
be unlawful for any person to engage in the business of slaughtering cattle,
sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules and other equines or manufacturing or
processing of meat or meat products without a license as required by this part.
[L 1969, c 214, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next